GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST/src/norm-allcap.xfst
# ============================================================================
# CONTENT:	(x)fst script for normalizer of overall caps
#
# LANGUAGE:	(PORTUGUESE)
# ENCODING:	UTF-8
# 
# AUTHOR:	A. Schiller
#
# CREATED:	13-Jun-2000
# UPDATED:	02-Aug-2006	(converted to UTF-8)
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:	xfst -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================


echo >>> normalization of overall capitals

define UPP 	[A|Á|À|Â|Ä|Å|Æ|Ã|B|C|Ç|D|Ð|E|É|È|Ê|Ë|F|G|H|I|Í|Ì|Î|Ï|J|K|L|M
 		|N|Ñ|O|Ó|Ò|Ô|Ö|Ø|Õ|P|Q|R|S|T|U|Ú|Ù|Ü|V|W|X|Y|Ý|Z];

define LOW 	[a|á|à|â|ä|å|æ|ã|b|c|ç|d|ð|e|é|è|ê|ë|f|g|h|i|í|ì|î|ï|j|k|l|m
 		|n|ñ|o|ó|ò|ô|ö|ø|õ|p|q|r|s|t|u|ú|ù|ü|v|w|x|y|ý|z];

define CAP	\[LOW] ;
define DECAP	\[UPP] ;

define FIRST [
 A (->) a , Á (->) á , À (->) à , Â (->) â , Ä (->) ä , Å (->) å, Æ (->) æ , Ã (->) ã ,
 B (->) b , 
 C (->) c , Ç (->) ç ,
 D (->) d , Ð (->) ð ,
 E (->) e , É (->) é , È (->) è , Ê (->) ê , Ë (->) ë , 
 F (->) f ,
 G (->) g , 
 H (->) h , 
 I (->) i , Í (->) í , Ì (->) ì, Î (->) î , Ï (->) ï ,
 J (->) j , 
 K (->) k , 
 L (->) l ,
 M (->) m , 
 N (->) n , Ñ (->) ñ ,
 O (->) o , Ó (->) ó , Ò (->) ò, Ô (->) ô, Ö (->) ö , Ø (->) ø , Õ (->) õ ,
 P (->) p , 
 Q (->) q , 
 R (->) r ,
 S (->) s , 
 T (->) t , 
 U (->) u , Ú (->) ú , Ù (->) ù , Ü (->) ü ,
 V (->) v , 
 W (->) w , 
 X (->) x ,
 Y (->) y , Ý (->) ý ,
 Z (->) z || .#. _ 
];

define REST [
 A -> a , Á -> á , À -> à , Â -> â , Ä -> ä , Å -> å, Æ -> æ , Ã -> ã ,
 B -> b , 
 C -> c , Ç -> ç ,
 D -> d , Ð -> ð ,
 E -> e , É -> é , È -> è , Ê -> ê , Ë -> ë , 
 F -> f ,
 G -> g , 
 H -> h , 
 I -> i , Í -> í , Ì -> ì, Î -> î , Ï -> ï ,
 J -> j , 
 K -> k , 
 L -> l ,
 M -> m , 
 N -> n , Ñ -> ñ ,
 O -> o , Ó -> ó , Ò -> ò, Ô -> ô, Ö -> ö , Ø -> ø , Õ -> õ ,
 P -> p , 
 Q -> q , 
 R -> r ,
 S -> s , 
 T -> t , 
 U -> u , Ú -> ú , Ù -> ù , Ü -> ü ,
 V -> v , 
 W -> w , 
 X -> x ,
 Y -> y , Ý -> ý ,
 Z -> z || .#. CAP+ _ [ UPP | .#. ]
];

read regex [ REST .o. FIRST ].i;
